Washington statutes.
RCW 4.92.200

Actions against state on state warrant appearing to be redeemed—Claim required—Time limitation.

No action shall be commenced against the state on account of any state warrant appearing to have been redeemed unless a claim has been presented and filed with the state treasurer within six years of the date of issuance of such warrant. The requirements of this section shall not extend or modify the period of limitations otherwise applicable within which an action must be commenced, but such period shall begin and shall continue to run as if no claim were required.

[ 1975 c 48 s 1.]

NOTES:

State warrants: RCW 43.08.061 through 43.08.080.